Hawaii statutes.
§147-74 Grading standards and regulations.
Subject to chapter 91, the department of agriculture may make rules with
respect to:

(1) Sale and transportation for sale of eggs for
human consumption;

(2) Specific grades or standards of quality,
condition and size or weight classes which shall conform when practical to
those established by the United States Department of Agriculture as local
conditions will permit;

(3) Inspection and classification;

(4) Assessment and collection of fees for requested
certification as to grade, standard of quality, condition, and size or weight
classes;

(5) Labeling of containers of imported and locally
produced eggs and marking of individual imported eggs as to origin;

(6) Seller's invoice for sale of eggs;

(7) Records of imported shell eggs of foreign origin;

(8) Methods of determining egg quality, which shall
not include recandling or any other method applied to eggs in interstate
commerce which is discriminatory or impairs that commerce in any way or
requires a cost increase of eggs in interstate commerce;

(9) Enforcement of this part and of the rules adopted
under this part. [L 1931, c 70, §4; RL 1935, §1076; RL 1945, §1307; am L 1955,
c 167, §1; RL 1955, §22-73; am L 1959, c 54, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am
L 1961, c 103 and c 132, §2; HRS §147-74; am L 1972, c 67, §1 and c 147, §2; am
L 1983, c 177, §2]

Case Notes

Cited: 41 H. 565,
566.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next